District of Columbia statutes.
1-1311

Transcripts as evidence.

All transcripts from such records certified by the Surveyor shall be prima facie evidence thereof.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1424, ch. 854, § 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-911.
1973 Ed., § 1-611.